src/morphology/phonology.twolc
!2016.QQ
"y:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 ь:0 <=> 
  [ н: | д: | т ] _ (%{ЕØ%}: %^RmVow:) %> (%{Х%}:) [ т: | %{КТ%}: ] ; 
!! plural
!!€ пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пан0%>ть
  [ н | р | д | з ] _  %> %{DIM%}: я ; 
!! ведь+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: __a little water__
!!€ ведь%>%{DIM%}я
!!€ вед0%>ня
 CnsDent: _ ( %>|%^PXSG1: %>) [ %{АЯ%}: | %{ИЫЙ%}: | %{ЕØ%}:е | %{ЕОØ%}: | (%^Ь2ZERO: %> ) %{ВИУ%}: ] ;
!!€ мяль%>%{ЕОØ%}зе
!!€ мял0%>езе
!! мирде+N+Sg+Nom: __husband/aviomies__
!!€ мирдь%{ЕØ%}#
!!€ мирд0е#
[ CnsDent: - [ л: | р: ] ] _ %^PXSG1: %> н е ;
!! кядь+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: __hand; arm__
!!€ кядь%^PXSG1%>не
!!€ кяд00%>не

[ч|ш|ж] _ %> с ;
!! учемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3
!!€ учь%>сь
!!€ уч0%>сь

[ CnsDent: - [ л: ] ] _ %> ц е ;
!! нярь+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: __hand; arm__
!!€ нярь%>це
!!€ няр0%>це

    _ %> [ и | %{АЕØ%}:е ] ;
!    _ %> %{АЕØ%}:е ;
!!€ афоль%>ине
!!€ афол0%>ине

 CnsDentNoL _ %> [ф т %{ЕОØ%}: м [ %{ЕОØ%}: ] | К1: | н | т | с: (т) [ ь: | е: ]] ;
!2018-07-01 CnsDentNoL _ %> [ф т %{ЕОØ%}: м [ %{ЕОØ%}: ] | К1: | н | д: | т | с: (т) [ ь: | е: ]] ;
 Cns: _ (%^Devoice:) %^Ь2ZERO: ;
!! изь+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: __they did not__
!!€ изь%^Devoice%^Ь2ZERO%>ть
!!€ ис000%>ть
!2016.QQ
!! ломань+N+SP+Abl+Indef:
!!$ ломань%>д%{АО%}
!!$ ломань%>да

!! !DIMINUTIVES
"%{DIM%}:н"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{DIM%}:н <=> [ Vows: | :Vows | м  | ж | б | в | н | д | л | р  | з | й] (ь:)  %> _ я ;
!!€ ши>%{DIM%}я
!!€ ши0ня
        к %> %{ЕО%}: _ я ;

"%{DIM%}:к"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{DIM%}:к <=> [ ф | т | ц | ч | :с | ш | х ] (ь) %> _ я: ;
!!€ пикс>%{DIM%}я
!!€ пикс0кя


!!Allow the absence of "ъ" in the first syllable
!"Loss of ъ in the first syllable orthography"
!ъ:0 <= # Cns* _ [ д | з | р | т ] ; REMOVE 2018-09-12

"%{ъØ%}:ъ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{ъØ%}:ъ <=>
 [# | Cns: ] _ \[ # ]* %^Ъ2PED: ;

!! !!Disallow

"Disallow TLoss after non-t"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
TLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :т ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow KLoss after non-k"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
KLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :к ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow SLoss after non-s"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
SLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :с ] ] %> _ ;

!"Disallow VLoss after non-U2I2"
!!! __@RULENAME@__  
!VLoss:0 /<= [[ :* [ Letters | А1: | %{АЯ%}: | %{ИЫЙ%}: | К1:  | %{ЬØ%}: | %{гк%}: | %{вгк%}: | К3:  ] ] - [ :* [ У2: | И2: ] ] ] %> _ ;


!"Disallow translative linking vowel vs no linking vowel "
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! k:k /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :*  к ]] %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ с  ;
!          к  %>  _ с  ;

"Disallow овок"
!! __@RULENAME@__
в:в /<=
    	[Cns|Vow] [б|в|г|д|ж|з|й:|л|м|н|п|р|с|ф|х|ц|ш|щ] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ о к ;
    	%> [с |т|%{ЕОØ%}: с т|%{ЕОØ%}: ц|%{ЕОØ%}: н|%{ЕОØ%}: н ь к о н ] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ о к ;

"Disallow Онга"
!! __@RULENAME@__
н:н /<=
    	%> [ш к а] %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ г а ;
        %{ЕОØ%}: _ к %> %{гк%}: %{АЕ%}: ;
!        %{ЕОØ%}: _ [ к|т ] %> %{гк%}: %{АЕ%}: ;

"Disallow -кс: нетькскс"
!! __@RULENAME@__
к:к /<=
       к с %> _ с ;
       к [Cns - [c]] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ с ;
       [Vows|Cns - [с|ц|ш|ч|д|т]] (ь:) %> %{ЕО%}: %> ш _ а ;
       Vows %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ с ;
       [Cns - [т|к|п|с]] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: в о _ ;

"Disallow -гя only after a few"
!! __@RULENAME@__
я:я /<=
     [[:Vows - [:и]] (%^Я2А:) |[Cns - [й]]|[Cns - [л|н|з|р|д]] ь:] %> г _ [# | %- |%>];
      [Cns - к] %> %{ЕО%}: %{DIM%}: _ ;
      _ %> %{ЕОØ%}: в а ;

"Disallow onset vowel after voiced cons"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%^PXSG1:0 /<=
     [г|й:|к|п|ф|х|ш|щ|ч|[т|с] (ь:) ] _ %>  н е [%>|# | %- ] ;
     [Vows:|Vows:|б|в|ж|м|[д|з|л|н|р] (ь:) ] _ %> %{ЕОØ%}: н е [%>|# | %- ] ;

!!TESTS
!echo 'п а н ж:ч > с ы' | hfst-pair-test src/phonology/vro-phon.compose.hfst
!echo 'панжемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst
